Wisconsin, session 2025, AB450.
do enact as follows:AB450,1Section 1. 101.02 (26) of the statutes is created to read:101.02 (26) Chapters SPS 361 to 366, Wis. Adm. Code, in effect on August 1, 2025, apply to a public building, public structure, or place of employment and s. SPS 361.03 (7), Wis. Adm. Code, does not apply to the public building, public structure, or place of employment if the plans of the public building, public structure, or place of employment are submitted to the department or, if the city, village, town, or county within which the public building, public structure, or place of employment is to be located is authorized to perform examinations under s. 101.12, that city, village, town, or county, no later than April 1, 2026. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab450 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab450 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB450 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB450 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB450: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting